si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3391 Y 1
SFX 3391 0 ගී .
SFX 4949 Y 1
SFX 4949 0 ගු .
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 0 ගෙ .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 ගේ .
SFX 3134 Y 1
SFX 3134 0 රුන්ට .
SFX 3385 Y 1
SFX 3385 0 ගෝ .
SFX 4417 Y 1
SFX 4417 0 රුන්ද .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 ෙක .
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 0 ෙට .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 0 ෙත .
SFX 2720 Y 1
SFX 2720 0 ෙද .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 ෙන .
SFX 592 Y 1
SFX 592 0 ෙම .
SFX 3458 Y 1
SFX 3458 0 ංගල .
SFX 2228 Y 1
SFX 2228 0 ිවිය .
SFX 1087 Y 1
SFX 1087 0 යන්ටද .
SFX 4506 Y 1
SFX 4506 0 යන්ටම .
SFX 3750 Y 1
SFX 3750 0 ීනට .
SFX 3605 Y 1
SFX 3605 0 ෙස .
SFX 3599 Y 1
SFX 3599 0 ේ .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 0 ීන් .
SFX 3717 Y 1
SFX 3717 0 ුණෙන් .
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 0 ාගෙන් .
SFX 2545 Y 1
SFX 2545 0 දීවත් .
SFX 3102 Y 1
SFX 3102 0 ල්ලන් .
SFX 1367 Y 1
SFX 1367 0 කරුවාගේ .
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 0 තුරු .
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 0 වූත් .
SFX 2019 Y 1
SFX 2019 0 යාණන් .
SFX 4329 Y 1
SFX 4329 0 වනලද .
SFX 1248 Y 1
SFX 1248 0 ෙතැයි .
SFX 3041 Y 1
SFX 3041 0 වැටිලා .
SFX 4615 Y 1
SFX 4615 0 බට් .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 ෙනවා .
SFX 4894 Y 1
SFX 4894 0 ණයක .
SFX 860 Y 1
SFX 860 0 ණයට .
SFX 1211 Y 1
SFX 1211 0 ගාරය .
SFX 2587 Y 1
SFX 2587 0 ණයද .
SFX 4910 Y 1
SFX 4910 0 ටමයි .
SFX 2585 Y 1
SFX 2585 0 ණයි .
SFX 671 Y 1
SFX 671 0 ණයේ .
SFX 2580 Y 1
SFX 2580 0 ණියත් .
SFX 4501 Y 1
SFX 4501 0 යමත් .
SFX 4853 Y 1
SFX 4853 0 තාවගේ .
SFX 646 Y 1
SFX 646 0 කරුට .
SFX 1300 Y 1
SFX 1300 0 වාදයෙන් .
SFX 3908 Y 1
SFX 3908 0 ැසීම .
SFX 1389 Y 1
SFX 1389 0 ුවක .
SFX 4119 Y 1
SFX 4119 0 ස්ථානවලට .
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 0 ුවට .
SFX 4982 Y 1
SFX 4982 0 ගතයුතු .
SFX 943 Y 1
SFX 943 0 ුවද .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 ුවන .
SFX 3664 Y 1
SFX 3664 0 ුවය .
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 0 ුවර .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 ුවල .
SFX 4141 Y 1
SFX 4141 0 සුදු .
SFX 3495 Y 1
SFX 3495 0 ්රා .
SFX 3494 Y 1
SFX 3494 0 ්රි .
SFX 4667 Y 1
SFX 4667 0 පතිවරයාට .
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 0 ්ගත .
SFX 1577 Y 1
SFX 1577 0 ්ගම .
SFX 446 Y 1
SFX 446 0 ්නැයි .
SFX 3552 Y 1
SFX 3552 0 ්ගය .
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 0 ුවා .
SFX 2689 Y 1
SFX 2689 0 ්ගල .
SFX 1849 Y 1
SFX 1849 0 ුවී .
SFX 2735 Y 1
SFX 2735 0 ුවූ .
SFX 2734 Y 1
SFX 2734 0 ුවෙ .
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 0 ුවේ .
SFX 622 Y 1
SFX 622 0 ුවෝ .
SFX 4797 Y 1
SFX 4797 0 දැක .
SFX 1544 Y 1
SFX 1544 0 කාවක් .
SFX 3468 Y 1
SFX 3468 0 ්වෙන්නට .
SFX 2687 Y 1
SFX 2687 0 ්ග් .
SFX 2688 Y 1
SFX 2688 0 ්ගෙ .
SFX 526 Y 1
SFX 526 0 ්ගේ .
SFX 4405 Y 1
SFX 4405 0 ර්ථයන් .
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 0 සේන .
SFX 1439 Y 1
SFX 1439 0 සේම .
SFX 4127 Y 1
SFX 4127 0 සේය .
SFX 2156 Y 1
SFX 2156 0 ්‍යමය .
SFX 1564 Y 1
SFX 1564 0 ්වෙන්නේ .
SFX 2595 Y 1
SFX 2595 0 ඥයන්ට .
SFX 3849 Y 1
SFX 3849 0 ිදාට .
SFX 2061 Y 1
SFX 2061 0 ධිපති .
SFX 1509 Y 1
SFX 1509 0 ධර්ම .
SFX 1316 Y 1
SFX 1316 0 රක .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 රට .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 රණ .
SFX 4447 Y 1
SFX 4447 0 රථ .
SFX 2007 Y 1
SFX 2007 0 රද .
SFX 3314 Y 1
SFX 3314 0 ද්‍රව්‍යවලට .
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 0 රන .
SFX 585 Y 1
SFX 585 0 රය .
SFX 1251 Y 1
SFX 1251 0 ුමකින් .
SFX 1155 Y 1
SFX 1155 0 ාවලිය .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 ර් .
SFX 442 Y 1
SFX 442 0 රා .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 රි .
SFX 1180 Y 1
SFX 1180 0 රී .
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 0 රු .
SFX 1996 Y 1
SFX 1996 0 රූ .
SFX 788 Y 1
SFX 788 0 රේ .
SFX 1179 Y 1
SFX 1179 0 රෝ .
SFX 2165 Y 1
SFX 2165 0 ්තම් .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 0 හතර .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 0 කමක් .
SFX 1554 Y 1
SFX 1554 0 කමකි .
SFX 4942 Y 1
SFX 4942 0 ගොඩට .
SFX 4700 Y 1
SFX 4700 0 න්තරයක් .
SFX 1052 Y 1
SFX 1052 0 හත් .
SFX 4104 Y 1
SFX 4104 0 හතේ .
SFX 4659 Y 1
SFX 4659 0 පත්වීම .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 0 ීමකදී .
SFX 2261 Y 1
SFX 2261 0 ිකොට .
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 0 ිණි .
SFX 2836 Y 1
SFX 2836 0 ිණී .
SFX 4291 Y 1
SFX 4291 0 වලියක් .
SFX 2090 Y 1
SFX 2090 0 තරය .
SFX 2860 Y 1
SFX 2860 0 ිකයකුට .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 කයන්ට .
SFX 4860 Y 1
SFX 4860 0 තරු .
SFX 1035 Y 1
SFX 1035 0 ීන්ගේ .
SFX 3867 Y 1
SFX 3867 0 ිතයට .
SFX 3866 Y 1
SFX 3866 0 ිතයද .
SFX 4876 Y 1
SFX 4876 0 තගේ .
SFX 913 Y 1
SFX 913 0 පතක් .
SFX 4174 Y 1
SFX 4174 0 සයකින් .
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 0 ිතයි .
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 0 ියේත් .
SFX 3066 Y 1
SFX 3066 0 වරින් .
SFX 2126 Y 1
SFX 2126 0 කෙරෙන .
SFX 2455 Y 1
SFX 2455 0 මේදි .
SFX 321 Y 1
SFX 321 0 මේදී .
SFX 4505 Y 1
SFX 4505 0 යන්නට .
SFX 3123 Y 1
SFX 3123 0 ලවලට .
SFX 1834 Y 1
SFX 1834 0 ෙනවාද .
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 0 හට .
SFX 4105 Y 1
SFX 4105 0 හඬ .
SFX 2968 Y 1
SFX 2968 0 හන .
SFX 1051 Y 1
SFX 1051 0 හම .
SFX 2321 Y 1
SFX 2321 0 හය .
SFX 1931 Y 1
SFX 1931 0 හර .
SFX 890 Y 1
SFX 890 0 හල .
SFX 2020 Y 1
SFX 2020 0 යන්නේ .
SFX 1775 Y 1
SFX 1775 0 ගුණ .
SFX 4089 Y 1
SFX 4089 0 හස .
SFX 4088 Y 1
SFX 4088 0 හළ .
SFX 2318 Y 1
SFX 2318 0 හා .
SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60 0 හි .
SFX 1433 Y 1
SFX 1433 0 හී .
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 0 හු .
SFX 4072 Y 1
SFX 4072 0 හූ .
SFX 2955 Y 1
SFX 2955 0 හේ .
SFX 1964 Y 1
SFX 1964 0 වාදීන්ගේ .
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 0 වරයාගෙන් .
SFX 4912 Y 1
SFX 4912 0 ටපත් .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 ඹීමට .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 ටත් .
SFX 2616 Y 1
SFX 2616 0 කුමාර් .
SFX 2439 Y 1
SFX 2439 0 යහොත් .
SFX 1566 Y 1
SFX 1566 0 ්විණි .
SFX 2716 Y 1
SFX 2716 0 ෙන්ට .
SFX 1833 Y 1
SFX 1833 0 ෙන්ඩ .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 ෙන්ද .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 ෙන්න .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 0 ෙන්ම .
SFX 3227 Y 1
SFX 3227 0 බන් .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 න්නන් .
SFX 3186 Y 1
SFX 3186 0 යකදි .
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 යකදී .
SFX 3042 Y 1
SFX 3042 0 වැටිය .
SFX 4682 Y 1
SFX 4682 0 න්වූයේ .
SFX 1294 Y 1
SFX 1294 0 වේදි .
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 0 වේදී .
SFX 686 Y 1
SFX 686 0 ීමකට .
SFX 4800 Y 1
SFX 4800 0 දාමය .
SFX 2896 Y 1
SFX 2896 0 ාලෝකය .
SFX 4475 Y 1
SFX 4475 0 යියා .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 ීමක් .
SFX 824 Y 1
SFX 824 0 ීමකි .
SFX 3113 Y 1
SFX 3113 0 ලීමටත් .
SFX 4866 Y 1
SFX 4866 0 තයත් .
SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119 0 යෙක් .
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 0 යෙකි .
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 යෙකු .
SFX 1452 Y 1
SFX 1452 0 වුණත් .
SFX 4980 Y 1
SFX 4980 0 ගතහොත් .
SFX 1878 Y 1
SFX 1878 0 ිල්ලක් .
SFX 4201 Y 1
SFX 4201 0 වේදීත් .
SFX 3413 Y 1
SFX 3413 0 කෙරුණු .
SFX 4999 Y 1
SFX 4999 0 කෙරුණේ .
SFX 3279 Y 1
SFX 3279 0 නේදැයි .
SFX 4264 Y 1
SFX 4264 0 වාසීහු .
SFX 2088 Y 1
SFX 2088 0 තලාවේ .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 0 පයට .
SFX 4649 Y 1
SFX 4649 0 පවලට .
SFX 4599 Y 1
SFX 4599 0 භවය .
SFX 4792 Y 1
SFX 4792 0 දිගින් .
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 0 ්හි .
SFX 2746 Y 1
SFX 2746 0 ුවකට .
SFX 4652 Y 1
SFX 4652 0 පයා .
SFX 1724 Y 1
SFX 1724 0 පයේ .
SFX 4463 Y 1
SFX 4463 0 රකට .
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 ුවක් .
SFX 3729 Y 1
SFX 3729 0 ුකිරීම .
SFX 1852 Y 1
SFX 1852 0 ුවකි .
SFX 944 Y 1
SFX 944 0 ුවකු .
SFX 1947 Y 1
SFX 1947 0 වෝද .
SFX 739 Y 1
SFX 739 0 රක් .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 වෝය .
SFX 3183 Y 1
SFX 3183 0 යන්ගෙන්ද .
SFX 4462 Y 1
SFX 4462 0 රකි .
SFX 4461 Y 1
SFX 4461 0 රකු .
SFX 3703 Y 1
SFX 3703 0 ුපිටිය .
SFX 3818 Y 1
SFX 3818 0 ියකටම .
SFX 4431 Y 1
SFX 4431 0 රාගේ .
SFX 4413 Y 1
SFX 4413 0 රුවත් .
SFX 1393 Y 1
SFX 1393 0 ුනත් .
SFX 2913 Y 1
SFX 2913 0 ායකය .
SFX 3343 Y 1
SFX 3343 0 ත්‍රික .
SFX 2298 Y 1
SFX 2298 0 ායක් .
SFX 3588 Y 1
SFX 3588 0 ේයි .
SFX 2122 Y 1
SFX 2122 0 ගන්නවා .
SFX 4560 Y 1
SFX 4560 0 මැද .
SFX 4256 Y 1
SFX 4256 0 වැනියා .
SFX 2297 Y 1
SFX 2297 0 ායතනයේ .
SFX 512 Y 1
SFX 512 0 ්නයි .
SFX 3523 Y 1
SFX 3523 0 ්නයේ .
SFX 3506 Y 1
SFX 3506 0 ්මකට .
SFX 1801 Y 1
SFX 1801 0 ්මක් .
SFX 4664 Y 1
SFX 4664 0 පතිවරුන්ට .
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 0 ගැන්මට .
SFX 3521 Y 1
SFX 3521 0 ්නියකි .
SFX 768 Y 1
SFX 768 0 ුණොත් .
SFX 3197 Y 1
SFX 3197 0 මෙන්ද .
SFX 2112 Y 1
SFX 2112 0 ගැන්මේ .
SFX 2442 Y 1
SFX 2442 0 ‍යය .
SFX 3892 Y 1
SFX 3892 0 ිකයන්ගෙන් .
SFX 4258 Y 1
SFX 4258 0 වැදුණු .
SFX 3528 Y 1
SFX 3528 0 ්දෙණිය .
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 0 හිදීය .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 ණයේදී .
SFX 2021 Y 1
SFX 2021 0 යන්ගෙ .
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 0 යන්ගේ .
SFX 3556 Y 1
SFX 3556 0 ්කරුවෙකු .
SFX 3683 Y 1
SFX 3683 0 ුරටත් .
SFX 3852 Y 1
SFX 3852 0 ිත්වයේ .
SFX 1148 Y 1
SFX 1148 0 ිත්වය .
SFX 3372 Y 1
SFX 3372 0 ණවලට .
SFX 4603 Y 1
SFX 4603 0 බෝධි .
SFX 1688 Y 1
SFX 1688 0 ලයක .
SFX 4611 Y 1
SFX 4611 0 බරය .
SFX 1177 Y 1
SFX 1177 0 ලයට .
SFX 1847 Y 1
SFX 1847 0 ුවීමට .
SFX 3226 Y 1
SFX 3226 0 බර් .
SFX 4610 Y 1
SFX 4610 0 බරා .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 ීහු .
SFX 2561 Y 1
SFX 2561 0 ත්මකව .
SFX 2766 Y 1
SFX 2766 0 ුණෙහි .
SFX 535 Y 1
SFX 535 0 ලයි .
