si_LK.dic
අපව/2283,2722,2968
ඇල්/7,72,81,103,388,428,568,1927,2068,2397,3391,4057,4615
ගැසුණ/592
ගේන/10,37,43,51,53,522,868
ග්ලාස්/3385
තනි/10,19,23,54,63,76,85,86,89,142,159,204,232,244,499,562,760,763,1123,1369,2501,4499,4501
තීර/3,15,17,19,23,24,27,33,40,44,68,74,208,210,240,271,322,397,515,623,702,710,719,860,1109,1389,1530,1852,2099,2588,2679,2732,3372,3373,4890,4891,4894
තෙල/6,16,101,110,1568,3528,3873,4949
දාව/57,671
දිනෙක/2545
දේව/6,16,18,20,27,41,52,57,75,93,106,138,165,169,187,189,206,331,337,349,406,420,422,691,802,904,957,959,966,1040,1162,1178,1289,1420,1437,1509,1640,1650,2178,2293,2296,2326,2327,2329,2400,2417,2429,2898,2907,3101,3111,3342,3972,3975,4119,4121,4361,4815
නැන්ද/13,134,193,468,753,1477,1503,2580,2582
නිම/4,6,13,16,20,37,53,54,57,63,76,82,85,86,111,130,142,144,146,148,161,169,198,218,233,246,259,265,272,292,296,335,371,398,423,437,480,482,549,611,778,831,1012,1043,1154,1416,1419,1637,1905,1924,1973,1984,2118,2126,2147,2158,2272,2273,2274,2285,2674,2869,2889,3523,3584,3913,3956,3957,4052,4219,4329
පටු/33,45,82,96,634,1732,2370,4590,4591
පනා/26,260,505,793,2475,3458
පැත්ත/1,2,4,8,17,21,25,28,30,36,47,91,105,181,199,224,294,295,313,575,926
පූර්/10,98,322,860,978,1529,2915
පෙම්වතිය/1,4,9,12,70,79,134
පෙළඹ/16,41,59,63,76,86,107,111,120,122,144,146,195,208,209,222,223,229,238,243,264,277,289,304,368,374,460,554,576,880,1606,1611,2715,2771
බරපතළ/1,7,13,89,301,411
බැල/16,18,24,41,52,83,111,120,129,139,160,208,209,221,243,271,280,374,449,460,515,720,766,1036,1136,1145,1377,1594,1595,1801,1850,2196,2503,2666,2730,2733,2734,2739,2740,3644,3653
බිඳ/4,17,24,25,41,52,57,59,61,62,80,86,107,111,120,136,221,229,238,354,377,378,397,403,514,556,952,1042,1043,2367,2788,2821,3040,3041,4262,4843
බිහිව/24,33,41,52,59,80,83,88,107,109,111,120,122,155,160,192,195,209,222,229,243,303,304,307,328,341,449,460,668,768,1022,1135,1242,1248,1584,2504
මනාල/27,49,516,2974,3605
මිස/4,6,17,41,79,170,242,263,295,882,1077,2170,2688,3495
මූලධර්ම/3,27,55,197,337,425,1299,1300
යෞවන/3,15,19,27,49,64,68,75,78,93,206,318,319,339,360,558,559,580,725,828,1087,1456
රූපලාවණ්‍ය/3,19,1211,1287
ලක්ව/2,24,33,41,52,59,80,83,88,107,109,111,120,122,160,195,208,243,277,289,303,304,307,328,341,576,610,666,820,943,1843,1867,2506
ලක්ෂ/3,14,15,17,19,23,26,40,44,56,112,128,322,335,394,405,454,702,705,710,728,933,1326,1355,1374,1375,1483,1529,1530,2155,2158,2159,2585,2586,2587,3372,3374,4550,4891
ලබා/61,94,113,469,614,712,756,1009,1361,2112,2340,4158,4953,4973,4982
ලබාදෙන/446
ලේඛක/14,27,49,64,78,90,93,104,119,124,152,154,236,273,339,539,2019,2928,4018
වාද/3,14,15,16,17,19,23,26,33,40,41,44,55,74,128,225,240,334,382,394,525,571,726,1035,1143,1197,1266,1323,1505,1613,2155,3750
වාර්තා/3,5,85,94,191,218,261,279,355,361,371,391,408,471,472,646,672,759,869,1120,1220,1367,2637
වැසි/27,29,31,62,64,78,90,93,119,124,154,178,185,236,273,369,416,466,536,704,723,1089,1255,1259,1481,1602,1706,1708,2210,2223,2710,3622,4506
විත්ති/3,19,23,60,191,235,261,391,408,472,646,1118,1218
විදිය/4910
විවර/3,10,13,14,71,112,322,710,1530,3643,4894
විෂ/4,7,9,63,83,2468,2476,3664
වෙහෙස/1,4,8,18,20,25,33,41,54,59,63,82,85,86,107,111,120,122,160,167,195,209,212,229,269,374,476,576,596,1860,2713,2764
ශූර/27,49,75,78,104,119,138,154,176,189,201,226,275,318,319,334,380,420,429,580,828,1006,1124,1613,2085,4850
සන්නස/1,4,6,17,2689
සලකුණ/478,623
සැල/6,41,59,76,80,111,130,146,209,212,229,238,292,384,632,967,1054,1440,1635,1652,1797,1904,1932,1934,1937,2137,2159,2332,2336,2337,2338,2339,2865,2866,2867,2881,2882,2976,2977,2978,2979,3906,3907,3908,3910,4132,4135,4137,4144,4147,4154,4157
සිව/6,9,16,20,24,52,393,542,595,781,821,947,948,1601,1697,2207,3469,3478
සුද/1,5,20,24,28,33,69,79,92,123,161,299,336,445,496,642,691,1021,1053,1427,2741,3527,3533,3535,3585
සුපිරි/7,890,4141
සුසන්තිකා/12
හරා/788
හරිය/601,998,2720,3958,4053
හුරු/3,10,13,63,85,130,167,196,259,549,582,1308,3102,4357
හේන/2,4,6,101,156,1382,3494
ළමය/1,5,10,16,18,20,79,123,134,153,193,215,216,257,420,477,630,687,1134,1629,1893,1894,1899
ළිඳ/2,4,8,13,21,3599
